Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.220

Response to petition charges.

When a date for a special recall election is set the certifying officer shall serve a notice of the date of the election to the officer whose recall is demanded and the person demanding recall. The manner of service shall be the same as for the commencement of a civil action in superior court. After having been served a notice of the date of the election and the ballot synopsis, the officer whose recall is demanded may submit to the certifying officer a response, not to exceed two hundred fifty words in length, to the charge contained in the ballot synopsis. Such response shall be submitted by the seventh consecutive day after service of the notice. The certifying officer shall promptly send a copy of the response to the person who filed the petition.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1418. Prior: 1984 c 170 s 9; 1980 c 42 s 1. Formerly RCW 29.82.105.]